distr/hunspell/affix/vr.aff
SFX T   ітися	ляться	пітися		#		сопітися	соляться	(Вони)
SFX T   ітися	ися	пітися		#		сопітися	сопися	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	ись	пітися		#		сопітись	сопись	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	імося	пітися		#		сопітися	сопімося	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	імось	пітися		#		сопітись	сопімось	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	імся	пітися		#		сопітися	сопімся	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	іться	пітися		#		сопітися	сопіться	(Ви)

SFX T   ітися	уся	удітися		#		гудітися	гудуся	(Я)
SFX T   ітися	усь	удітися		#		гудітись	гудусь	(Я)
SFX T   ітися	ешся	удітися		#		гудітися	гудешся	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	еться	удітися		#		гудітиться	гудеться	(Він)
SFX T   ітися	емося	удітися		#		гудітися	гудемося	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	емось	удітися		#		гудітись	гудемось	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	емся	удітися		#		гудітися	гудемся	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	етеся	удітися		#		гудітися	гудетеся	(Ви)
SFX T   ітися	етесь	удітися		#		гудітись	гудетесь	(Ви)
SFX T   ітися	яться	удітися		#		гудітися	гудяться	(Вони)
SFX T   ітися	ися	удітися		#		гудітися	гудися	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	ись	удітися		#		гудітись	гудись	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	імося	удітися		#		гудітися	гудімося	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	імось	удітися		#		гудітись	гудімось	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	імся	удітися		#		гудітися	гудімся	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	іться	удітися		#		гудітися	гудіться	(Ви)

SFX T   ітися	уся	вітися		#		ревітися	ревуся	(Я)
SFX T   ітися	усь	вітися		#		ревітись	ревусь	(Я)
SFX T   ітися	ешся	вітися		#		ревітися	ревешся	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	еться	вітися		#		ревітиться	реветься	(Він)
SFX T   ітися	емося	вітися		#		ревітися	ревемося	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	емось	вітися		#		ревітись	ревемось	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	емся	вітися		#		ревітися	ревемся	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	етеся	вітися		#		ревітися	реветеся	(Ви)
SFX T   ітися	етесь	вітися		#		ревітись	реветесь	(Ви)
SFX T   ітися	яться	вітися		#		ревітися	ревяться	(Вони)
SFX T   ітися	ися	вітися		#		ревітися	ревися	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	ись	вітися		#		ревітись	ревись	(Ти)
SFX T   ітися	імося	вітися		#		ревітися	ревімося	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	імось	вітися		#		ревітись	ревімось	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	імся	вітися		#		ревітися	ревімся	(Ми)
SFX T   ітися	іться	вітися		#		ревітися	ревіться	(Ви)


# Наказова форма для v3

#subgroup vr3.imprt1

SFX U Y 6

SFX U   утися	ися	нутися		#		кашлянутися	кашлянися	(Ти)
SFX U   утися	ись	нутися		#		кашлянутись	кашлянись	(Ти)
SFX U   утися	імося	нутися		#		кашлянутися	кашлянімося	(Ми)
SFX U   утися	імось	нутися		#		кашлянутись	кашлянімось	(Ми)
SFX U   утися	імся	нутися		#		кашлянутися	кашлянімся	(Ми)
SFX U   утися	іться	нутися		#		кашлянутися	кашляніться	(Ви)




# Дієслова, що неможливо (або дуже важко) обробляти іншими правилами

#group vr4
